Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 9 REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT ACT
32-9-127. Maturities of notes and warrants.

Notes and warrants may mature at such time not exceeding two years from the respective dates of their issuance as the board may determine. They shall not be extended or funded except by the issuance of bonds, special obligation bonds, or interim notes in compliance with sections 32-9-128 and 32-9-130.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-26.

L. 70:

p. 304, § 1.

32-9-128. Incurrence of special obligations.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the revenues and the sales tax proceeds of the district, but not the proceeds of any general ad valorem property taxes, and issue special obligation bonds to evidence the amount so borrowed. Any special obligation bonds or other obligations payable in whole or in part from the sales tax proceeds of the district or revenues of the district, or both, may be issued or incurred without an election, in anticipation of such sales tax proceeds or revenues, or both.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 721, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-27.

L. 70:

p. 293, § 103.

L. 73:

993, § 7.

L. 82:

Entire section amended, p. 501, § 6, effective April 15.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 308, § 5, effective April 5.

32-9-128.5. Private activity and exempt facility bonds.

In order to maximize public and private participation in federal funding opportunities and opportunities for transportation infrastructure development, the district, in addition to the other powers granted by this article, shall have the following powers:

Subject to the requirements specified in subsection (2) of this section, to issue private activity or exempt facility bonds as authorized by federal law; and

To enter into agreements with private businesses under which:

The district agrees to loan to a private business the net proceeds of private activity or exempt facility bonds issued so that the private business can finance all or a portion of a mass transportation system project that is owned by, leased from the district by, or operated by the private business; and

The private business agrees that it has the sole responsibility to pay, either directly or indirectly through the district or a bond trustee, all financial obligations owed to bond holders and that it shall provide and maintain any reserve deemed necessary by the district to ensure that the financial obligations are paid.

The private activity or exempt facility bonds issued by the district as authorized by paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall specify that bond holders may not look to any revenues of the district for repayment of the bonds. The bonds shall further specify that the only sources of repayment for the bonds are revenues provided by the private business, property of the private business, or credit enhancement obtained by the private business that may be pledged to the payment of the bonds. Because private activity or exempt facility bonds are payable only from said sources, such bonds shall not be deemed to create district indebtedness or a multiple-fiscal year obligation within the meaning of any provision of the state constitution or the laws of this state, and the district may issue such bonds without voter approval.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state or any state agency, county, municipality, or other municipal or quasi-municipal corporation or political subdivision may, in connection with a mass transportation system project financed by private activity or exempt facility bonds issued by the district, lend or grant money or any other form of real, personal, or mixed property directly to a private business developing or operating the project or indirectly to such a private business through the district and may enter into contracts to make such loans and grants, all upon terms and conditions the district or private business and the state, state agency, county, municipality, or municipal or quasi-municipal corporation or political subdivision may agree upon. If a loan or grant is paid indirectly to a private business through the district, the district shall forward the loan or grant to the private business immediately, and the loan or grant shall not be deemed to be revenues of the district.

The provision of mass transportation services by private operators under contract to and operating within the district is not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado created in section 40-2-101 (1), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1073, § 1, effective August 5.

32-9-129. Issuance of temporary bonds.

The district may, without an election, issue temporary bonds, pending preparation of definitive bonds and exchangeable for the definitive bonds when prepared, as the board may determine. Each temporary bond shall set forth substantially the same conditions, terms, and provisions as the definitive bond for which it is exchanged. Each holder of a temporary bond shall have all the rights and remedies which he would have as a holder of the definitive bond.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 722, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-29.

L. 73:

993, § 8.

32-9-130. Issuance of interim notes.

The district may borrow money and issue interim notes evidencing short-term loans for the acquisition or improvement and equipment of any mass transportation facility of the district in supplementation of long-term financing and the issuance of bonds, as provided in section 32-9-148.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 722, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-30.

L. 73:

993, § 9.

32-9-131. Pledge of proceeds of sales taxes and revenues.

The payment of district securities may be secured by the specific pledge of the proceeds of sales taxes or revenues, or both such taxes and revenues, of the district, as the board may determine. Revenues or sales taxes pledged for the payment of any securities, as received by the district, shall immediately be subject to the lien of each such pledge, without any physical delivery thereof, any filing, or further act, and the lien of each such pledge and the obligation to perform the contractual provisions made in the authorizing resolution or other instrument relating thereto shall have priority over all other obligations and liabilities of the district, except as may be otherwise provided in this article or in said resolution or instrument, and subject to any prior pledges and liens theretofore created. The lien of each such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all persons having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the district, irrespective of whether such persons have notice thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 722, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-31.

L. 73:

994, § 10.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 308, § 6, effective April 5.

32-9-132. Ranking among different issues.

Except as otherwise provided in the authorizing resolution of the board, all securities of the same issue or series shall, subject to the prior rights of outstanding securities, claims, and other obligations, have a prior lien on the revenues pledged for the payment of the securities.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 722, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-32.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 309, § 7, effective April 5.

32-9-133. Ranking in same issue.

All securities of the same issue or series shall be equally and ratably secured without priority by a lien on the revenues of the district in accordance with the provisions of this article and the authorizing resolution, or other instrument relating thereto, except to the extent such resolution or other instrument shall otherwise expressly provide.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 723, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-33.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 309, § 8, effective April 5.

32-9-134. Payment recital in securities.

District securities issued under this article and constituting special obligations shall recite in substance that the securities and the interest thereon are payable solely from the revenues of the district or the sales tax proceeds of the district, or both, as the case may be, pledged to the payment thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 723, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-34.

L. 73:

p. 994, § 13.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 309, § 9, effective April 5.

32-9-135. Incontestable recital in securities.

Any authorizing resolution, or other instrument relating thereto under this article, may provide that each security therein designated shall recite that it is issued under authority of this article. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all the provisions of this article, and all securities issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 723, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-35.

32-9-136. Limitation upon payment.

The payment of securities shall not be secured by any encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the district, other than revenues, proceeds of sales taxes, or any other moneys pledged for the payment of the securities. No property of the district, subject to said exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of the securities.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 723, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-36.

L. 73:

p. 994, § 14.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 309, § 10, effective April 5.

32-9-137. Security details.

Any district securities authorized to be issued in this article shall bear such date, shall be in such denomination, shall mature at such time, but in no event exceeding forty years from their date or any shorter limitation provided in this article, and shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of securities does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized, which interest may be evidenced by one or two sets of coupons payable annually or semiannually, except that the first interest payment date appertaining to any security may represent interest for any period not in excess of one year, as may be prescribed by resolution or other instrument. The securities and any coupons shall be payable in such medium of payment at any banking institution or such other place within or without the state as determined by the board, and the securities at the option of the board may be in one or more series, may be made subject to prior redemption in advance of maturity in such order or by lot or otherwise at such time without or with the payment of such premium, not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount of each security so redeemed, as determined by the board. For any securities the issuance of which does not require approval at an election pursuant to this article, the maximum net effective interest rate shall be established by the board prior to the sale and issuance of such securities.

Any district securities may be issued with privileges for conversion or registration, or both, for payment as to principal or interest, or both, and where interest accruing on the securities is not represented by interest coupons, the securities may provide for the endorsing of payments of interest thereon, and the securities generally shall be issued in such manner, in such form, either coupon or registered, with such recitals, terms, covenants, and conditions, and with such other details, as may be provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the securities, or other instrument appertaining thereto, except as otherwise provided in this article.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of securities or any other instrument relating thereto may provide for their reissuance in other denominations in negotiable or nonnegotiable form and otherwise in such manner and form as the board may determine.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 723, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-38.

L. 70:

p. 294, § 105.

32-9-138. Negotiability.

Subject to the payment provisions specifically provided in this article, any district securities and any interest coupons thereto attached shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S., except as the board may otherwise provide.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 724, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-39.

32-9-139. Single bonds.

The board may:

Provide for the initial issuance of one or more securities, in this section called "bond", aggregating the amount of the entire issue, or a designated portion thereof;

Make such provision for installment payments of the principal amount of any such bond as the board may consider desirable;

Provide for the making of any such bond payable to bearer or otherwise, registrable as to principal or as to both principal and interest, and where interest accruing thereon is not represented by interest coupons, for the endorsing of payments of interest on each such bond;

Further make provision in any such proceedings for the manner and circumstances in which any such bond may in the future, at the request of the holder or owner thereof, be converted into securities of smaller denominations, which securities of smaller denominations may in turn be either coupon bonds or bonds registrable as to principal, or principal and interest, or both, at the option of the holder or owner.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 724, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-40.

L. 73:

p. 994, § 11.

32-9-140. Sale of securities.

Any securities authorized in this article, except for warrants not issued for cash, and except for temporary bonds issued pending preparation of definitive bonds, shall be sold at public or private sale for not less than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, or at the board's option, below par, at a discount not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount thereof, but such securities shall never be sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

No discount, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, or commission shall be allowed or paid on or for any security sale to any purchaser or bidder, directly or indirectly.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 724, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-41.

L. 70:

p. 294, § 106.

32-9-141. Application of proceeds.

All moneys received from the issuance of any securities authorized in this article shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 724, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-42.

32-9-142. Use of unexpended proceeds.

Any unexpended balance of such security proceeds remaining after the completion of the purposes for which such securities were issued shall be credited immediately to the fund or account created for the payment of the principal of said securities and shall be used therefor, subject to the provisions as to the times and methods for their payment as stated in the securities and the proceedings authorizing or otherwise appertaining to their issuance, or so paid into a reserve therefor.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 724, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-43.

32-9-143. Covenants in security proceedings.

Any resolution or trust indenture authorizing the issuance of securities or any other instrument relating thereto may contain covenants and other provisions limiting the exercise of powers conferred by this article upon the board in order to secure the payment of such securities, in agreement with the holders and owners of such securities, as the board may determine.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 725, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-44.

32-9-144. Remedies of security holders.

Subject to contractual limitations binding upon the holders or owners of any issue or series of securities or trustee therefor and subject to any prior or superior rights of others, any holder or owner of securities or trustee therefor shall have the right and power for the equal benefit and protection of all holders and owners of securities similarly situated:

By mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the district and its board and any of its officers, agents, and employees, and to require and compel the district or its board or any such officers, agents, or employees to perform and carry out their duties, obligations, or other commitments under this article and their covenants and agreements with the holder or owner of any security;

By action or suit in equity to require the district and its board to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to have appointed a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any revenues or any proceeds of taxes, or both, pledged for the payment of the securities, prescribe sufficient fees derived therefrom, and collect, receive, and apply all revenues or other moneys pledged for the payment of the securities in the same manner as the district itself might do in accordance with the obligations of the district;

By action or suit in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the holder of any security and to bring suit thereupon.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 725, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-45.

L. 2000:

(1)(c) amended, p. 309, § 11, effective April 5.

32-9-145. Limitations upon liabilities.

Neither the directors nor any person executing any district securities issued under this article shall be liable personally on the securities by reason of the issuance thereof. Securities issued pursuant to this article shall not in any way create or constitute any indebtedness, liability, or obligation of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, except the district, and nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the district to incur any indebtedness on behalf of or in any way to obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof, except the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 725, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-46.

32-9-146. Interest after maturity.

No interest shall accrue on any security authorized in this article after it becomes due and payable if funds for the payment of the principal of and the interest on the security and any prior redemption premium due are available to a paying agent for such payment without default.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 725, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-47.

32-9-147. Refunding bonds.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any bonds issued under this article may be refunded without an election, subject to the provisions concerning their payment and to any other contractual limitations in the proceedings authorizing their issuance or otherwise relating thereto.

Any bonds issued for refunding purposes may either be delivered in exchange for the outstanding bonds authorized to be refunded or may be sold as provided in this article for the sale of other bonds.

No bonds may be refunded under this article unless the holders thereof voluntarily surrender them for exchange or payment or unless they either mature or are callable for prior redemption under their terms within ten years from the date of issuance of the refunding bonds. Provision shall be made for paying the bonds within said period of time. No maturity of any bonds refunded may be extended over fifteen years. The rate of interest on such refunding bonds shall be determined by the board. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may exceed the principal amount of the refunded bonds if the aggregate principal and interest costs of the refunding bonds do not exceed such unaccrued costs of the bonds refunded, except the extent any interest on the bonds refunded in arrears or about to become due is capitalized with the proceeds of the refunding bonds. The principal amount of the refunding bonds may also be less than or the same as the principal amount of the bonds refunded so long as provision is duly and sufficiently made for their payment.

The proceeds of refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be refunded or be placed in escrow or in trust to be applied to the payment of the bonds refunded upon their presentation therefor. Any proceeds held in escrow or in trust, pending such use, may be invested or reinvested in securities meeting the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S. Such proceeds and investments in escrow or in trust, together with any interest or other gain to be derived from any such investment, shall be in an amount at all times sufficient as to principal, interest, any prior redemption premium due, and any charges of the escrow agent or trustee payable therefrom to pay the bonds refunded as they become due at their respective maturities or due at designated prior redemption dates upon which the board shall be obligated to call the refunded bonds for prior redemption.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the relevant provisions pertaining to bonds generally shall be equally applicable in the authorization and issuance of refunding bonds, including their terms and security, the bond resolution, trust indenture, taxes, and revenues, and other aspects of the bonds.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 725, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-48.

L. 70:

p. 294, § 107.

L. 73:

pp. 994, 995, §§ 12, 16.

L. 89:

(4) amended, p. 1120, § 42, effective July 1.

32-9-148. Issuance of interim notes.

Whenever a proposal to issue bonds for any purpose authorized in this article has been approved at an election held in accordance with this article, the district may borrow money without any other election in anticipation of sales taxes or of the receipt of the proceeds of said bonds and to issue interim notes to evidence the amount so borrowed; except that the aggregate amount of the interim notes may not exceed the amount so authorized by the election. Any interim notes may mature at such time not exceeding a period of time equal to the estimated time needed to effect the purposes for which the bonds are authorized to be issued, plus two years, as the board may determine. Except as otherwise provided in this section, interim notes shall be issued as provided in this article for district securities.

Sales taxes, proceeds of bonds to be thereafter issued or reissued, and bonds issued for the purpose of securing the payment of interim notes, or any combination thereof, may be pledged for the purpose of securing the payment of the interim notes. Any bonds pledged as collateral security for the payment of any interim notes shall mature at such time as the board may determine, but in no event exceeding forty years from the date of either any of such bonds or any of such interim notes, whichever date is the earlier. Any such bonds pledged as collateral security shall not be issued in an aggregate principal amount exceeding the aggregate principal amount of the interim notes or interim notes secured by a pledge of such bonds, nor shall they bear interest at any time which, with any interest accruing at the same time on the interim notes so secured, exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

For the purpose of funding any interim notes, any bonds pledged as collateral security to secure the payment of such interim notes, upon their surrender as pledged property, may be reissued without an election, and any bonds not previously issued but authorized to be issued at an election may be issued for such a funding. Any such bonds shall mature at such time as the board may determine, but in no event exceeding forty years from the date of either any of the interim notes so funded or any of the bonds so pledged as collateral security, whichever date is earlier. Bonds may be issued separately or issued in combination in one series or more. Except as otherwise provided in this section any such funding bonds shall be issued as is provided in this article for district securities.

No interim note issued pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be extended or funded except by the issuance or reissuance of a bond in compliance with the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 726, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-49.

L. 70:

p. 295, § 108.

L. 73:

p. 994, § 15.

32-9-149. Elections.

Where in this article an election is permitted or required, the election shall be held concurrently or jointly with any general election held under the laws of this state or in accordance with article 41 of title 1, C.R.S., as applicable.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 727, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-50.

L. 70:

p. 296, § 109.

L. 81:

(2) amended, p. 1626, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1283, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 86:

(2) repealed, p. 1221, § 31, effective May 30.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 911, § 164, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1325, § 4, effective May 25.

32-9-150. Election resolution.

The board shall call any election by resolution adopted at least thirty days prior to the election. The resolution shall recite:

The objects and purposes of the election for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred;

The estimated cost;

How much, if any, of said estimated cost is to be defrayed out of any federal grant or money other than that received from indebtedness to be incurred;

The estimated additional annual cost of operation and maintenance of any facility, the acquisition of which the indebtedness, in whole or in part, is to be incurred;

The amount of principal of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum net effective interest rate to be paid on such indebtedness;

The date upon which the election shall be held; and

The name of the designated election official who shall be responsible for conducting the election pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

and (3) (Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 911, § 165, effective January 1, 1993.)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 727, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-51.

L. 70:

p. 296, § 110.

L. 92:

IP(1), (1)(f), (2), and (3) amended and (1)(g) added, p. 911, § 165, effective January 1, 1993.

32-9-151. Conduct and costs of elections.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, any district election shall be held and conducted in accordance with articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

The district shall reimburse each affected county for all true and actual costs of conducting a district election pursuant to sections 1-5-505 and 1-5-506, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 728, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-52.

L. 70:

p. 296, §§ 111, 112.

L. 71:

pp. 962, 963, §§ 10, 11.

L. 73:

p. 989, § 6.

L. 77:

(5) amended, p. 233, § 9, effective June 19; (8) amended, p. 1513, § 76, effective July 15.

L. 80:

(3) and (9) amended, p. 415, § 28, effective February 21.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1284, § 5, effective June 3.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 911, § 166, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1791, § 80, effective June 6.

32-9-152. Notice of election. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 729, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-53.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1284, § 6, effective June 3.

32-9-153. Polling places. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 729, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-54.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1284, § 6, effective June 3.

32-9-154. Election supplies. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 729, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-55.

L. 70:

p. 297, § 113.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1513, § 77, effective July 15.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1284, § 6, effective June 3.

32-9-155. Election returns. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 729, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-56.

L. 70:

p. 297, § 114.

L. 71:

p. 963, § 12.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1284, § 6, effective June 3.

32-9-156. District - tax exempted.

The district shall be exempted from any general ad valorem taxes upon any property of the district acquired and used for purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 730, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-57.

32-9-157. Dissolution of district. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 69:

p. 730, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-58.

L. 72:

p. 483, § 7.

L. 73:

p. 989, § 7.

L. 76:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 603, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section repealed, p. 1284, § 6, effective June 3.

32-9-158. Merger, consolidation, or assumption of district.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent the merger, consolidation, or assumption of the regional transportation district with, into, or by any other district, authority, or political subdivision of the state that may be authorized and formed pursuant to the laws and constitution of the state of Colorado, so long as adequate and equitable provisions are made upon merger, consolidation, or assumption for the discharge of all obligations of the district and for the protection of the rights of all holders of securities of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 731, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-61.

32-9-159. Freedom from judicial process.

Execution or other judicial process shall not issue against any property of the district authorized in this article, nor shall any judgment against the district be a charge or lien upon its property.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to or limit the right of the holder or owner of any district securities, his trustee, or any assignee of all or part of this interest, the federal government or any public body when it is a party to any contract with the district, and any other obligee under this article to foreclose, to enforce, or to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the district on the proceeds of any taxes or revenues or both, or on any other moneys of the district.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 730, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-59.

32-9-160. Misdemeanors.

Any person who wrongfully damages, injures, or destroys, or in any manner impairs the usefulness of any facility, property, structure, improvement, equipment, or other property of the district acquired under the provisions of this article 9, or who wrongfully interferes with any officer, agent, or employee of the district in the proper discharge of the officer's, agent's, or employee's duties, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

If the district is damaged by any such act, it may also bring a civil action for damages sustained by any such act, and in such proceeding the prevailing party shall also be entitled to reasonable attorneys' fees and costs of court.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 731, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-60.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3257, § 547, effective March 1, 2022.

32-9-161. Eminent domain.

Subsequent to approval of incurrence of debt and issuance of securities in an election held pursuant to section 32-9-108, the power of eminent domain vested in the district shall include, but not be limited to, the power to condemn, in the name of the district:

Either the fee simple or any lesser estate or interest in any real property which the board by resolution determines is necessary for carrying out the purposes of this article; such resolution shall be prima facie evidence that the condemnation of the fee simple, or other lesser estate or interest in real property, is necessary for carrying out the purposes of this article;

Any property necessary to carry out any of the purposes of this article, even if such property is already devoted to the same use by any person or public body, except the federal government unless the federal government consents to such condemnation; and

Any existing transportation system of any person or public body in the district in use.

The district shall not abandon any condemnation proceedings after the date upon which the district took possession of the property condemned.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 986, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-20-63.

Editor's note:

Section

32-9-108

, which is referenced in subsection (1) of this section, was repealed by L. 83, p. 1284, § 6. The election formerly detailed in that section, concerning authorizing the district to issue securities, payable from a district-wide sales tax, for the development of a multimodal mass transportation system was held September 7, 1973.

32-9-162. Money management.

The district has the authority to structure and transact its banking affairs in a manner most financially advantageous to the district, consistent with prevailing prudent business practice. The district may conduct its banking affairs with any banking or other state or federally regulated financial institution, which is federally insured, whether such bank or other financial institution is within or without the district.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1120, § 2, effective May 5.

32-9-163. Investment management.

In addition to the authority granted the district under section 32-9-119 (1)(n), (1)(o), and (1)(p), the district may invest its moneys in any of the following:

Obligations of the United States government or its agencies and instrumentalities;

Certificates of deposit or other evidences of deposit or investment of a bank, a savings and loan association, or any other state or federally regulated financial institution, which is federally insured;

Bankers' acceptances drawn on and accepted by commercial banks;

Collateralized prime commercial paper;

Repurchase agreements and reverse repurchase agreements the underlying collateral of which consists of the instruments set forth in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (1);

Money market mutual funds the portfolios of which consist of the instruments set forth in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (1);

Securities of the district.

In addition to the investments authorized by subsection (1) of this section, the district, for purposes of hedging against interest rate risk only and not for speculation, may enter into contractual arrangements involving debt futures and options on debt futures only on obligations of the United States government.

Investment decisions shall be made with the judgment and care, under circumstances then prevailing, which persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs and shall not be made for speculation but shall be made for investment, considering the probable credit quality of their capital as well as the probable income to be derived.

The district shall establish a written investment policy with respect to investing the moneys of the district. The investment policy shall address, but shall not be limited to, liquidity, diversification, credit quality of principal, yield, maturity, and quality and capability of investment management, with primary emphasis on credit quality and liquidity.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1120, § 2, effective May 5.

32-9-164. Custodians.

For purposes of making deposits or investments, the board may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the moneys of the district, who shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the board requires.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1120, § 2, effective May 5.